Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.300

Applicability.

This chapter applies to receivers and receiverships otherwise provided for by the laws of this state except as otherwise expressly provided for by statute or as necessary to give effect to the laws of this state. This chapter does not apply to any proceeding authorized by or commenced under Title 48 RCW.

[ 2004 c 165 s 32.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.